Florida, session 2026, HB6521.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. The facts stated in the preamble to this act
are found and declared to be true.
Section 2. Miami-Dade County is authorized and directed to
appropriate from funds not otherwise encumbered and to draw a
warrant in the sum of $4.1 million payable to Jose Correa as
compensation for injuries and damages sustained.
Section 3. The amount paid by Miami-Dade County pursuant
to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the amount awarded under
this act are intended to provide the sole compensation for all
present and future claims arising out of the factual situation
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S

HB 6521 2026
described in this act which resulted in injuries and damages to
Jose Correa. The total amount paid for attorney fees and
lobbying fees relating to this claim may not exceed 25 percent
of the total amount awarded under this act.
Section 4. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6521-00